District of Columbia statutes.
32-1006

Regulatory powers of Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor shall make and revise regulations, including definitions of terms, as deemed appropriate to carry out the purposes of this subchapter or necessary to prevent its circumvention or evasion and to safeguard the minimum wage rates and the overtime provisions established by this subchapter.

(b)

The Mayor shall make regulations in order to:

(1)

Provide reasonable allowances for board, lodging, or services customarily furnished by employers to employees; and

(2)

Provide allowances for other special conditions or circumstance that may be usual in a particular employer-employee relationship.

(c)

The Mayor may make regulations in order to:

(1)

Define and govern the employment of workers under 18 years of age and provide minimum wages for these workers at a rate lower than that specified in § 32-1003;

(2)

Govern piece rates, bonuses, and commissions in relation to time rates;

(3)

Govern part-time rates;

(4)

Govern minimum daily wages;

(5)

Relate to wage provisions governing split shifts and excessive spread of hours; and

(6)

Govern uniforms, tools, travel, and other items of expense incurred by employees as a condition of employment.

(d)

The Council of the District of Columbia shall review and make recommendations, as needed, to the Mayor or the Mayor’s authorized representative, to ensure that the minimum wage set by the federal government, plus $1, is fair and adequate for employees in the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 9-248, § 7, 40 DCR 761

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-1002 and § 32-1010.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-220.5.